Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1823.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 16A.057, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Monitoring Office of the Legislative Auditor audits. The commissioner must review audit reports from the Office of the Legislative Auditor and take appropriate steps to address internal control problems found in executive agencies.new text begin The commissioner must report annually by January 15 to the chairs and ranking minority members of the committees in the senate with jurisdiction over finance and the house of representatives with jurisdiction over ways and means with a detailed list of recommended actions made by the legislative auditor. For each of those recommended actions:new text end new text begin (1) describe in detail the actions taken in accordance with the recommendation; new text end new text begin (2) assess the degree to which the recommended action is complete; new text end new text begin (3) explain why the recommended action has not been completed; new text end new text begin (4) describe the work required to complete the agency's response to the recommended action; and new text end new text begin (5) provide the timeline for completion of the agency's response to fully address the concern raised by the legislative auditor. new text end